Hawaii statutes.
[§668A-5] Commissioners. If the court
appoints commissioners pursuant to section 668-13, each commissioner, in
addition to the requirements and disqualifications applicable to commissioners
in section 668-13, shall be disinterested, impartial, and neither a party to
nor a participant in the action. [L 2016, c 260, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next